District of Columbia statutes.
9-1171

Aerial wires for streetcars.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other law, the Mayor is authorized to install aerial wires in accordance with this chapter for the sole purpose of powering or supporting wires that power streetcar transit where aerial wire power is necessary or, in the Mayor’s determination, is more feasible than other currently available forms of propulsion.

(b)

The installation of aerial wires authorized by this section is limited to the H Street/Benning Road streetcar transit line, between the intersection of North Capitol Street and H Street, N.E. on the west and the Anacostia River on the east until the requirements of § 9-1173 are met.

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-339, § 2, 58 DCR 618
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Transportation Infrastructure Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-583, October 19, 2010, 57 DCR 10129).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Transportation Infrastructure Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-486, July 19, 2010, 57 DCR 7164).
“(b) The installation of aerial wires authorized by this section is limited to the H Street/Benning Road streetcar transit line, between the intersection of North Capitol Street and H Street, N.E., on the west and the Anacostia River on the east until the requirements of section 4 are met.
“(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Mayor is authorized to install aerial wires in accordance with this act for the sole purpose of powering or supporting wires that power streetcar transit where aerial wire power is necessary or, in the Mayor’s determination, is more feasible than other currently available forms of propulsion.
“Sec. 2. Aerial wires for streetcars.
Sections 2 and 3 of D.C. Law 18-258 added a section to read as follows:
This section is referenced in § 9-1173.